Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1114
Adjusted average per pupil cost of the preceding year, defined.

Adjusted average per pupil cost of the preceding year means the amount computed by dividing the total instructional expenditure, excluding special education expenditures, by the preceding year's average daily membership as reported in the annual financial report. The costs of sectarian instruction shall not be included in determining the adjusted average per pupil cost of the preceding year, and the computation shall be subject to an audit by appropriate state agencies.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 67;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 72;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3304;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 796.